North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15.1 Elementary and Secondary Education
CHAPTER 15.1-09 School Boards
15.1-09-34.1.
Vehicle and heating fuel — Purchases.

At least once each year, the board of a school district shall publish in the official newspaper of the district information regarding the registration of vehicle fuel vendors and heating fuel vendors. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the board shall purchase vehicle fuel and heating fuel only after seeking written quotes from all vendors who registered with the district for that school year.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 161, § 17.

15.1-09-35.
Reports by school boards on conditions of schools.

Upon the conclusion of each school year, the board of a school district shall:

Prepare a report regarding the condition of all schools in the district, including their financial condition and the educational progress of students enrolled in each school;

Forward a copy of the report to the county superintendent of schools; and

Publish in the official newspaper of the school district that portion of the report which deals with the financial condition of each school.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 9.

15.1-09-36.
School board — Authority over student fees.

A school board may not charge a fee for textbooks or other items necessary for completion of a specific course required for grade advancement or graduation.

A school board may:

Require that a student pay a security deposit for the return of textbooks, materials, supplies, or equipment.

Assess a student a use charge if a textbook or other item covered under subsection 1 has received undue wear.

Require that a student furnish personal or consumable items.

Require that a student pay an admission fee or other charges for extracurricular or noncurricular activities if the student’s attendance is optional.

Require that a student pay a fee or a premium for any authorized student health and accident benefit plan.

Require that a student pay a fee for personal athletic equipment and apparel; provided the board shall allow a student to use the student’s own equipment and apparel if it meets reasonable health and safety standards established by the board.

Require that a student pay a fee in any program which generates a product that becomes the personal property of the student.

Require that a student pay a fee for behind-the-wheel driver’s education instruction.

Require that a student pay a fee for goods, including textbooks, and services provided in connection with any postsecondary level program or any program established outside regular elementary, middle school, or secondary school programs, including career and technical programs, and adult or continuing education programs.

Require that a student pay a fee for the use of a musical instrument owned or rented by the school district, provided that the total fee payable by the student for a school year does not exceed the annual rental cost to the district or the annual depreciation plus actual maintenance cost for the instrument.

Require that a student pay any other fees and charges permitted by statute.

A board may waive any fee if a student or the student’s parent or guardian is unable to pay the fee.

A board may not deny or abridge a student’s rights or privileges, including the receipt of grades and diplomas, because of the nonpayment of fees. A board, however, may withhold a student’s diploma for failure to pay for costs incurred by the student’s own negligence or choice, including fines for damaged textbooks and school equipment, library fines, and materials purchased from the school at the option of the student.

This section does not preclude the operation of a school store where students may purchase school supplies and materials.

If a board charges fees not authorized by law and refuses to discontinue the charges when directed to do so by the superintendent of public instruction, the superintendent shall withhold the state aid payments to which the district is entitled for each student charged an unauthorized fee.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 9; 2003, ch. 138, § 50; 2003 ch. 154, § 1; 2003 Sp., ch. 667, § 5.

15.1-09-37.
Duties of school board — Postsecondary instructional programs — Fees. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2001, ch. 161, § 37.

15.1-09-38.
Duties of school board — Employment of relatives. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2003, ch. 151, § 2.

15.1-09-39.
Districts in bordering states — Contract.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board of a school district in this state may contract with the board of a school district in another state for the joint operation and maintenance of school facilities and for joint activities, if the districts are contiguous. To be valid, the contract must be approved by the superintendent of public instruction and by a majority of the qualified electors residing in the district.

In assessing the contract, the superintendent shall consider the district’s enrollment, its valuation, and its longevity.

If the superintendent approves the contract, the board shall submit the contract to the electorate of the district, for approval, at an annual or a special election.

The board shall publish notice of the election in the official newspaper of the district at least fourteen days before the election. The notice must include a statement regarding the purpose of the election and the terms of the contract.

On the ballot, the board shall seek the voters’ permission to execute the proposed contract, as approved by the superintendent of public instruction.

If the voters approve the execution of the contract, the board may levy and collect taxes, as permitted in accordance with chapter 57-15, to carry out the contract pursuant to law.

If a district that is a party to a contract under this section dissolves, any district to which the land of the dissolved district is attached shall assume the contractual responsibilities.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 9; 2013, ch. 13, § 25.

15.1-09-40.
Sharing of levied taxes — Contract.

The boards of two or more school districts may contract to share levied taxes in all or a portion of their respective districts. The rate of taxes to be levied on any property in the joint taxing area or district is the rate of tax provided for in the contract, not exceeding any levy limitations under chapter 57-15. The auditor of each county in which all or a portion of a contracting district is located shall fix and levy taxes on that portion of the property which is described in the contract and is located in the county at the rate set by the contract.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 9; 2013, ch. 13, § 26.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 26 of chapter 13, S.L. 2013 became effective July 1, 2013.

15.1-09-41.
School board authority — Reward for destruction of school property.

The board of a school district may offer and pay a reward to any person who furnishes information leading to the apprehension and conviction of one appropriating or destroying property or equipment belonging to the district.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 9.

15.1-09-42.
Educational meetings — Attendance by school district personnel. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 167, § 36.

15.1-09-43.
Purchase of schoolbus — Payment period.

The board of a school district may purchase a bus body, a chassis, or a complete bus, provided the body, chassis, or complete bus meets standards provided by section 39-21-27.1. A board may use money in its general fund to purchase a bus body, a chassis, or a complete bus on an installment plan, provided the plan does not extend beyond six years.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 9.

15.1-09-44.
Schoolbuses — Use of nonprofit organizations.

The board of a school district may make a schoolbus available to a nonprofit organization for use in conjunction with the organization’s activities. The board shall negotiate the terms of usage with the organization. The terms must address rental charges and insurance coverage. The driver of a schoolbus used by a nonprofit organization under this section must satisfy the requirements for a schoolbus driver set forth in section 15.1-07-20.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 9; 2001, ch. 161, § 18.

15.1-09-45.
Storage facilities for schoolbuses.

The board of a school district may lease for purchase, purchase, or construct a storage facility for schoolbuses upon advertised bids as provided in section 15.1-09-34. For these purposes, the board may use money in the district’s general fund or building fund provided the money is not otherwise obligated.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 9.

15.1-09-46.
School district census. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 163, § 57.

15.1-09-47.
Board of education of city of Fargo — Taxing authority.

The board of education of the city of Fargo may levy taxes within the requirements or limitations of this title and title 57.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 9; 2013, ch. 13, § 27; 2015, ch. 137, § 4, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 4 of chapter 137, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

Note.

The 2015 amendment to this section by section 4, of chapter 137, S.L. 2015, was to remove the expiration date of the section.

15.1-09-48.
Board of education of city of Fargo — Tax collection.

The board of education of the city of Fargo may levy taxes within the boundaries of the Fargo public school district and cause the taxes to be collected in the same manner as other city taxes, provided the taxes meet the requirements or limitations of this title and title 57. The business manager of the board of education shall certify the rate for each purpose to the city auditor in time to be added to the annual tax list of the city.

The city auditor shall calculate and extend upon the annual assessment roll and tax list any tax levied by the board of education. The tax must be collected in the same manner as other city taxes.

If the city council fails to levy any tax for city purposes or fails to cause an assessment roll or tax list to be made, the board of education may make an assessment roll and tax list and submit the roll to the city auditor with a warrant for the collection of the tax. The board of education may cause the tax to be collected in the same manner as other city taxes are collected or as otherwise provided by resolution of the board.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 9; 2005, ch. 156, § 2; 2013, ch. 13, § 28; 2015, ch. 137, § 5, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 5 of chapter 137, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

Note.

The 2015 amendment to this section by section 5, of chapter 137, S.L. 2015, was to remove the expiration date of the section.

15.1-09-49.
Board of education of city of Fargo — Taxes for buildings.

The amount to be raised for teacher salaries and contingent expenses must be such only as together with the public money coming to the city from any source is sufficient to establish and maintain efficient and proper schools for students in the city. The tax for purchasing, leasing, or improving sites and the building, purchasing, leasing, enlarging, altering, and repairing of schools may not exceed in any one year fifteen mills on the taxable valuation of property in the school district. The board of education may borrow, and when necessary shall borrow, in anticipation of the taxes to be raised, levied, and collected.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 9; 2013, ch. 13, § 29.

15.1-09-50.
Board of education of city of Fargo — Powers.

In addition to the powers granted to all school boards by section 15.1-09-33, the board of education of the city of Fargo has the power and duty:

To organize, establish, and maintain schools within the boundaries of the Fargo public school district; to change and discontinue the schools; and to liquidate the assets of the discontinued schools, as authorized by the state board of public school education.

To lease houses or rooms for school purposes, lease lots or sites for schools, and fence real property.

To build, enlarge, alter, improve, and repair schools and appurtenances upon lots or sites now owned or leased for school purposes.

To provide, sell, exchange, improve, and repair school apparati, books for indigent students, and appendages.

To provide fuel and other supplies for the schools.

To have the custody and safekeeping of the schools, books, furniture, and appurtenances and to see that local ordinances regarding schools are observed.

To compensate teachers out of the money appropriated and provided by law for the support of the public schools within the boundaries of the district so far as the same is sufficient, and to pay any remainder due from the money raised as authorized by this chapter.

To have the control and management of the public schools within the boundaries of the district and from time to time to adopt rules for their good order, prosperity, and utility.

To prepare and report to the mayor and the city council ordinances and regulations necessary for the protection, safekeeping, and care of the schools, lots, sites, and appurtenances and all the property belonging to the city, connected with and appertaining to the schools, and to suggest proper penalties for the violation of ordinances and regulations.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 9; 2001, ch. 161, § 19; 2005, ch. 156, § 3.

15.1-09-51.
Board of education of city of Fargo — School property.

The title to all schools, sites, lots, furniture, books, apparati, and appurtenances, belonging to the city, and used for school purposes, under the control of the board of education are vested in the city of Fargo for the use of the schools. While used for or appropriated to school purposes, the same may not be:

Levied upon or sold by virtue of any warrant, execution, or other process;

Subject to any judgment or lien; or

Subject to taxation for any purpose.

The city in its corporate capacity is competent to accept and dispose of any real or personal estate transferred to it by gift, grant, bequest, or devise, for the use of the public schools of the city, whether the property is transferred to the city or to any person for the use of the schools.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 9.

15.1-09-52.
Board of education of city of Fargo — Ownership of real property.

Whenever any real property is purchased by the board, the transfer or grant and conveyance of the property must be taken to the “city of Fargo for the use of the schools” and whenever any sale is made by the board, it must be so resolved and placed upon the records of the board. The conveyance must be executed, in the name of the city of Fargo, by the president of the board and attested to by the business manager. The president and the business manager may execute conveyances upon a sale or exchange, with or without full covenants or warranty, on behalf of the city.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 9.

15.1-09-53.
School district employees’ group health plans.

In contracting for a school district employees’ group health plan, the board of a school district shall meet the bidding requirements of section 15.1-09-34. No contract for a school district employees’ health plan may be of a duration greater than six years.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 197, § 2.

15.1-09-54.
School district technology consortium — Authority to borrow money.

A school district technology consortium formed under chapter 54-40.3 may borrow money for instructional technology acquisition provided:

The outstanding principal borrowed by a consortium under this section does not exceed one hundred seventy-five thousand dollars;

The loan repayment period does not exceed ten years;

The loan is approved in writing by the board of each school district participating in the consortium;

The loan is:

Approved by a majority of the eligible electors residing in each school district participating in the consortium, as evidenced by their signatures on a petition clearly stating the purpose of the loan, the amount of the loan, and its terms of repayment, and filed with the superintendent of public instruction; or

Approved by a majority of each participating school district’s electors voting on the question at a regular school district election or at a special election called by the board; and

The loan is approved by the superintendent of public instruction.

The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules setting forth the criteria for loan approval. The superintendent of public instruction may not approve a loan under this section if the superintendent determines that the instructional technology acquisition is not compatible with the statewide information technology plan.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 198, § 2.

Note.

A new section was enacted to N.D.C.C. ch. 15-29 by S.L. 1999, ch. 198, § 1, which was identical to section 15.1-09-54, above. That section was effective April 9, 1999 through July 1, 1999, pursuant to S.L. 1999, ch. 198, §§ 3 and 4, and has not been codified.

15.1-09-55.
School district superintendent — Joint employment — Accreditation.

The superintendent of public instruction may not impose through the accreditation process any penalties or sanctions on a school district for employing a superintendent jointly with one or more other districts. The superintendent may not require, through the accreditation process, that an employee of a school district having fewer than one hundred students in high school spend more than thirty-three percent of the employee’s time performing the duties of a school principal if the school district employs a superintendent jointly with one or more other districts.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 169, § 9.

15.1-09-56.
Student financial institution.

A school board may establish, maintain, and supervise a student financial institution which is not subject to section 6-02-01, 6-02-03, 6-03-67.1, or 6-06-05 or any other statute or rule that regulates banks, other financial institutions, or currency exchanges. To qualify as a student financial institution, the student financial institution must be operated as part of a high school educational program under guidelines adopted by the school board, be advised on a regular basis by one or more state-chartered or federally chartered financial institutions including credit unions, but not owned or operated by a financial institution, be located on school premises and have as customers only students enrolled in, or employees of, the school of which it is located, and have a written commitment from the school board guaranteeing reimbursement of any depositor’s funds lost due to insolvency of the student financial institution. Funds of a student financial institution that meet the requirements of this section are not school district or other public funds for purposes of any state law governing the use or investment of school district or other public funds. For purposes of borrowing money, cashing checks, and taking deposits concerning the operation of a student financial institution, the obligations of a minor have the same force and effect as though they were the obligations of a person over the age of majority.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 168, § 2.

Note.

As enacted, this section was designated as a new subsection to N.D.C.C. §

15-29-08. It was redesignated 15.1-09-56 at the direction of the code revisor.

15.1-09-57.
Licensure to teach — Course area or field — Request for exception — Report.

If the board of a school district or of a nonpublic school is unable to fill a particular position by recruiting or assigning an individual who is licensed to teach in that particular course area or field, the school board may fill the position with an individual who is not licensed to teach in that particular course area or field, provided the individual:

Is licensed to teach by the education standards and practices board or is approved to teach by the education standards and practices board;

Holds at least a minor or a minor equivalency in the course area or field in which the individual seeks to teach; and

Has received a temporary exception under this section.

The education standards and practices board shall adopt rules governing the issuance of temporary exceptions under this section. Except for a case of sudden and unexpected vacancy occurring during the school calendar, the rules must require consideration of a school board’s efforts to fill a particular position and the school board’s efforts to explore alternative methods of education delivery to the students. The rules must also require that the individual submit a plan for a course of study which will enable the individual to obtain a major or a major equivalency in the course area or field in which the individual seeks to teach.

An exception granted under this section is valid only through the conclusion of the school year in which the request for exception is submitted to the education standards and practices board. The board may extend the exception by one-year increments, provided the individual demonstrates successful completion of at least one-third of the total course of study prior to each requested extension.

At the conclusion of each school year, the education standards and practices board shall file a report with the legislative council. The report must cite all requests for exceptions under this section received by the board during the school year and must include the board’s response to each request and a brief description of the board’s rationale.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 163, § 2.

15.1-09-58.
Four-year old program — Authorization — Support. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The board of a school district may establish a four-year old program and, provided the program is approved by the department of human services in accordance with section 50-11.1-21, may support that program with:

Local tax revenues, other than those necessary to support the district’s kindergarten program and the provision of elementary and high school educational services;

State moneys specifically appropriated for the program;

Federal funds specifically appropriated or approved for the program; and

Gifts, grants, and donations specifically given for the program.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 162, § 5; 2013, ch. 149, § 1; 2013, ch. 150, § 1; 2021, ch. 358, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

15.1-09-58.
Four-year old program — Authorization — Support. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The board of a school district may establish a four-year old program and, provided the program is approved by the department of health and human services in accordance with section 50-11.1-21, may support that program with:

Local tax revenues, other than those necessary to support the district’s kindergarten program and the provision of elementary and high school educational services;

State moneys specifically appropriated for the program;

Federal funds specifically appropriated or approved for the program; and

Gifts, grants, and donations specifically given for the program.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 162, § 5; 2013, ch. 149, § 1; 2013, ch. 150, § 1.

15.1-09-59.
Maintenance of insurance — Report to superintendent of public instruction.

At least once every six years, each school district shall work with its commercial property insurance carrier for the purpose of ensuring that:

All school district buildings and facilities are properly identified and accurately valued; and

The contents of all school district buildings and facilities are properly inventoried and accurately valued.

If a school district can demonstrate to the satisfaction of the superintendent of public instruction that the district completed the requirements of subsection 1 during the period beginning July 1, 2006, and ending June 30, 2011, the district’s six-year requirement for identification and valuation begins on the date that the requirements were met.

If a school district cannot demonstrate to the satisfaction of the superintendent of public instruction that the district completed the requirements of subsection 1 during the period beginning July 1, 2006, and ending June 30, 2011, the district shall complete the requirements during the 2011-12 school year.

Annually, each school district shall review the terms of any insurance policies providing coverage for its buildings, its facilities, and their contents and ensure that the policies are sufficient to provide in full for the repair or replacement of the buildings, its facilities, and their contents, in the event of a loss.

Annually, the superintendent of public instruction shall verify that each school district is in compliance with the requirements of this section.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 175, § 10; 2011, ch. 134, § 1.

15.1-09-60.
School district safety plan — Establishment of school safety plan fund — Approval — Open records exemption.

The board of a school district may develop a school safety plan, in consultation with the qualified electors residing within the district, and establish and maintain a school safety plan fund subject to the limitations in section 57-15-14.2. A school safety plan developed by the board of a school district is exempt from the provisions of section 44-04-18 and section 6 of article XI of the Constitution of North Dakota with respect to aspects of the plan addressing the security of students.

Source:

2019, ch. 482 § 1, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2018.